Maryland, session 2026, HB0144.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 11–213 of Article – Commercial Law of the Annotated Code of Maryland be
renumbered to be Section(s) 11–214.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
11–204.
(a) A person may not:
(1) By contract, combination, or conspiracy with one or more other persons,
unreasonably restrain trade or commerce;
(2) Monopolize, attempt to monopolize, or combine or conspire with one or
more other persons to monopolize any part of the trade or commerce within the State, for
the purpose of excluding competition or of controlling, fixing, or maintaining prices in trade
or commerce;
(3) Directly or indirectly discriminate in price among purchasers of
commodities or services of like grade and quality, if the effects of the discrimination may:
(i) Substantially lessen competition;
(ii) Tend to create a monopoly in any line of trade or commerce; or
(iii) Injure, destroy, or prevent competition with any person who
grants or knowingly receives the benefit of the discrimination or with customers of either
of them;
(4) In the course of commerce, pay or contract for the payment of anything
of value to or for the benefit of a customer of the person as compensation for or in
consideration of any service or facility furnished by or through the customer in connection
with the processing, handling, sale, or offering for sale of any service or commodity
manufactured, sold, or offered for sale by the person, unless the payment or consideration
is available on proportionally equal terms to all other customers competing in the
distribution of the service or commodity;
(5) Discriminate in favor of one purchaser against another purchaser of a
commodity bought for resale, with or without processing, by contracting to furnish,
furnishing, or contributing to the furnishing of any service or facility connected with the
processing, handling, sale, or offering for sale of the commodity on terms not accorded to
all purchasers on proportionally equal terms; or

HOUSE BILL 144 3
(6) Lease or make a sale or contract for the sale of a patented or unpatented
commodity or service for use, consumption, enjoyment, or resale, or set a price charged for
the commodity or service or discount from or rebate on the price, on the condition,
agreement, or understanding that the lessee or purchaser will not use or deal in the
commodity or service of a competitor of the lessor or seller, if the effect of the lease, sale, or
contract for sale or the condition, agreement, or understanding may:
(i) Substantially lessen competition; or
(ii) Tend to create a monopoly in any line of trade or commerce.
11–209.
(a) (1) The Attorney General shall institute proceedings in equity to prevent
or restrain violations of § 11–204 of this subtitle and may require assistance from any
State’s Attorney for that purpose.
(4) (i) In addition to the equitable remedies or other relief authorized
by this section, the court may assess against any person who violates § 11–204 of this
subtitle a civil penalty not exceeding $10,000 for each violation, to be paid to the [General
Fund of the State] FAIR PRICING AND MARKET COMPETITION FUND ESTABLISHED
UNDER § 11–213 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(ii) Each day that a violation of § 11–204 of this subtitle continues is
a separate violation.
11–213.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DIVISION” MEANS THE ANTITRUST DIVISION OF THE OFFICE OF
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(3) “FUND” MEANS THE FAIR PRICING AND MARKET COMPETITION
FUND.
(B) THERE IS A FAIR PRICING AND MARKET COMPETITION FUND.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE ADDITIONAL FUNDING TO
SUPPORT THE DIVISION IN THE ENFORCEMENT OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.

HOUSE BILL 144
(E) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER § 11–209(A)(4) OF
THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(3) ANY OTHER CIVIL PENALTIES, DAMAGES, ATTORNEY’S FEES, OR
COSTS AWARDED TO THE STATE IN AN ACTION FILED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(4) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(G) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY TO SUPPORT THE OPERATIONS OF THE
DIVISION.
(H) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
(I) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(J) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND FOR THE OPERATIONS OF THE
DIVISION IS SUPPLEMENTAL TO AND IS NOT INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE OF
FUNDING THAT OTHERWISE WOULD BE APPROPRIATED FOR THE OPERATIONS OF
THE DIVISION.
(K) FOR FISCAL YEARS 2028 THROUGH 2033, THE GOVERNOR SHALL
INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION TO THE FUND IN AN
AMOUNT SUFFICIENT TO EMPLOY ONE FULL–TIME INVESTIGATOR POSITION IN THE
DIVISION.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, beginning in fiscal year 2028,
a Position Identification Number (PIN) shall be created in the Antitrust Division of the
Office of the Attorney General for a full–time investigator position.

HOUSE BILL 144 5
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.